Missouri, session 2026, SB1305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 571.030, 571.107, and 571.215, RSMo,
2 are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
3 be known as sections 571.030, 571.107, and 571.215, to read as
4 follows:
1 571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2 use of weapons, except as otherwise provided by sections
3 571.101 to 571.121, if he or she knowingly:
4 (1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person
5 a knife, a firearm, a blackjack or any other weapon readily
6 capable of lethal use into any area where firearms are
7 restricted under section 571.107; or
8 (2) Sets a spring gun; or
9 (3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling
10 house, a railroad train, boat, aircraft, or motor vehicle as
11 defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure
12 used for the assembling of people; or
13 (4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons,
14 any weapon readily capable of lethal use in an angry or
15 threatening manner; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1305 2
16 (5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable
17 of lethal use on his or her person, while he or she is
18 intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or
19 projectile weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner
20 or discharges such firearm or projectile weapon unless
21 acting in self-defense; or
22 (6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of
23 any occupied schoolhouse, courthouse, or church building; or
24 (7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any
25 object, or at random, on, along or across a public highway
26 or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
27 (8) Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily
28 capable of lethal use into any church or place where people
29 have assembled for worship, or within three hundred feet of
30 or into any election precinct or polling place on any
31 election day, or into any building owned or occupied by any
32 agency of the federal government, state government, or
33 political subdivision thereof; or
34 (9) Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor
35 vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, discharges or shoots
36 a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or
37 at any building or habitable structure, unless the person
38 was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
39 (10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded, or
40 any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
41 school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any
42 function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
43 officials or the district school board; or
44 (11) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in
45 possession of a controlled substance that is sufficient for
46 a felony violation of section 579.015.

SB 1305 3
47 2. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
48 this section shall not apply to the persons described in
49 this subsection, regardless of whether such uses are
50 reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
51 fulfillment of such person's official duties except as
52 otherwise provided in this subsection. Subdivisions (3),
53 (4), (6), (7), and (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall
54 not apply to or affect any of the following persons, when
55 such uses are reasonably associated with or are necessary to
56 the fulfillment of such person's official duties, except as
57 otherwise provided in this subsection:
58 (1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who
59 have completed the training required by the police officer
60 standards and training commission pursuant to sections
61 590.030 to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of
62 arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the
63 state or for violation of ordinances of counties or
64 municipalities of the state, whether such officers are on or
65 off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of
66 the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified
67 retired peace officers, as defined in subsection 12 of this
68 section, and who carry the identification defined in
69 subsection 13 of this section, or any person summoned by
70 such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
71 peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;
72 (2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons,
73 penitentiaries, jails and other institutions for the
74 detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
75 (3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard
76 while performing their official duty;
77 (4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of
78 the Constitution of Missouri with the judicial power of the

SB 1305 4
79 state and those persons vested by Article III of the
80 Constitution of the United States with the judicial power of
81 the United States, the members of the federal judiciary;
82 (5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute
83 process, civil or criminal;
84 (6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight
85 deck officer as defined under the federal flight deck
86 officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of
87 whether such officers are on duty, or within the law
88 enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
89 (7) Any state probation or parole officer, including
90 supervisors and members of the parole board;
91 (8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the
92 definition and fulfilling the requirements of the
93 regulations established by the department of public safety
94 under section 590.750;
95 (9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or
96 assistant medical examiner;
97 (10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or
98 assistant prosecuting attorney; circuit attorney or
99 assistant circuit attorney; municipal, associate, or circuit
100 judge; or any person appointed by a court to be a special
101 prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety training
102 course required under subsection 2 of section 571.111;
103 (11) Any member of a fire department or fire
104 protection district who is employed on a full-time basis as
105 a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry
106 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid
107 concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such uses
108 are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
109 fulfillment of such person's official duties; and

SB 1305 5
110 (12) Upon the written approval of the governing body
111 of a fire department or fire protection district, any paid
112 fire department or fire protection district member who is
113 employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed
114 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a
115 valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
116 associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
117 person's official duties.
118 3. Subdivisions (1), (5), (8), and (10) of subsection
119 1 of this section do not apply when the actor is
120 transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an
121 unloaded state when ammunition is not readily accessible or
122 when such weapons are not readily accessible. Subdivision
123 (1) of subsection 1 of this section does not apply to any
124 person nineteen years of age or older or eighteen years of
125 age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces,
126 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,
127 transporting a concealable firearm in the passenger
128 compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as such concealable
129 firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed, nor when the actor
130 is also in possession of an exposed firearm or projectile
131 weapon for the lawful pursuit of game, or is in his or her
132 dwelling unit or upon premises over which the actor has
133 possession, authority or control, or is traveling in a
134 continuous journey peaceably through this state.
135 Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section does not
136 apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed by a
137 person while traversing school premises for the purposes of
138 transporting a student to or from school, or possessed by an
139 adult for the purposes of facilitation of a school-
140 sanctioned firearm-related event or club event.

SB 1305 6
141 4. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
142 this section shall not apply to any person who has a valid
143 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
144 to 571.121, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued
145 before August 28, 2013, or a valid permit or endorsement to
146 carry concealed firearms issued by another state or
147 political subdivision of another state.
148 5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and
149 (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
150 persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense pursuant
151 to section 563.031.
152 6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
153 the contrary, the state shall not prohibit any state
154 employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on
155 the state's property provided that the vehicle is locked and
156 the firearm is not visible. This subsection shall only
157 apply to the state as an employer when the state employee's
158 vehicle is on property owned or leased by the state and the
159 state employee is conducting activities within the scope of
160 his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection,
161 "state employee" means an employee of the executive,
162 legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the
163 state of Missouri.
164 7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this
165 section shall not apply to a person who is a school officer
166 commissioned by the district school board under section
167 162.215 or who is a school protection officer, as described
168 under section 160.665.
169 (2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for
170 a student to actually participate in school-sanctioned gun
171 safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other
172 school-sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events,

SB 1305 7
173 provided the student does not carry a firearm or other
174 weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto
175 any school bus, or onto the premises of any other function
176 or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or
177 the district school board.
178 8. A person who commits the crime of unlawful use of
179 weapons under:
180 (1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (11) of subsection 1
181 of this section shall be guilty of a class E felony;
182 (2) Subdivision (1), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1
183 of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor,
184 except when a concealed weapon is carried onto any private
185 property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-
186 limits to concealed firearms by means of one or more signs
187 displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of eleven
188 inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in
189 letters of not less than one inch, in which case the
190 penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107 shall apply;
191 (3) Subdivision (5) or (10) of subsection 1 of this
192 section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the
193 firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is
194 loaded;
195 (4) Subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
196 shall be guilty of a class B felony, except that if the
197 violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
198 results in injury or death to another person, it is a class
199 A felony.
200 9. Violations of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of
201 this section shall be punished as follows:
202 (1) For the first violation a person shall be
203 sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
204 a class B felony;

SB 1305 8
205 (2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined
206 in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to the
207 maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
208 without the possibility of parole, probation or conditional
209 release for a term of ten years;
210 (3) For any violation by a persistent offender as
211 defined in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to
212 the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B
213 felony without the possibility of parole, probation, or
214 conditional release;
215 (4) For any violation which results in injury or death
216 to another person, a person shall be sentenced to an
217 authorized disposition for a class A felony.
218 10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other
219 person in the violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1
220 of this section shall be subject to the same penalty as that
221 prescribed by this section for violations by other persons.
222 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
223 person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a felony
224 violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a
225 suspended imposition of sentence if such person has
226 previously received a suspended imposition of sentence for
227 any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
228 12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace
229 officer" means an individual who:
230 (1) Retired in good standing from service with a
231 public agency as a peace officer, other than for reasons of
232 mental instability;
233 (2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to
234 engage in or supervise the prevention, detection,
235 investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of

SB 1305 9
236 any person for, any violation of law, and had statutory
237 powers of arrest;
238 (3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as
239 a peace officer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more,
240 or retired from service with such agency, after completing
241 any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a
242 service-connected disability, as determined by such agency;
243 (4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the
244 retirement plan of the agency if such a plan is available;
245 (5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has
246 met, at the expense of the individual, the standards for
247 training and qualification for active peace officers to
248 carry firearms;
249 (6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
250 intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance; and
251 (7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a
252 firearm.
253 13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of
254 subsection 2 of this section is:
255 (1) A photographic identification issued by the agency
256 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
257 officer that indicates that the individual has, not less
258 recently than one year before the date the individual is
259 carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise
260 found by the agency to meet the standards established by the
261 agency for training and qualification for active peace
262 officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the
263 concealed firearm; or
264 (2) A photographic identification issued by the agency
265 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
266 officer; and

SB 1305 10
267 (3) A certification issued by the state in which the
268 individual resides that indicates that the individual has,
269 not less recently than one year before the date the
270 individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
271 otherwise found by the state to meet the standards
272 established by the state for training and qualification for
273 active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as
274 the concealed firearm.
1 571.107. 1. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant
2 to sections 571.101 to 571.121, a valid concealed carry
3 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed
4 carry endorsement or permit issued by another state or
5 political subdivision of another state shall authorize the
6 person in whose name the permit or endorsement is issued to
7 carry concealed firearms on or about his or her person or
8 vehicle throughout the state. No concealed carry permit
9 issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, valid
10 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
11 or a concealed carry endorsement or permit issued by another
12 state or political subdivision of another state shall
13 authorize any person to carry concealed firearms into:
14 (1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or
15 station without the consent of the chief law enforcement
16 officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of
17 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the office or
18 station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
19 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
20 the vehicle is on the premises;
21 (2) Within [twenty-five] three hundred feet of any
22 polling place on any election day. Possession of a firearm
23 in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not
24 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed

SB 1305 11
25 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
26 premises;
27 (3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or
28 correctional institution, prison or jail. Possession of a
29 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile
30 detention, or correctional institution, prison or jail shall
31 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
32 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
33 on the premises;
34 (4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit,
35 appellate or supreme court, or any courtrooms,
36 administrative offices, libraries or other rooms of any such
37 court whether or not such court solely occupies the building
38 in question. This subdivision shall also include, but not
39 be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other court
40 offices, any room or office wherein any of the courts or
41 offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily
42 conducting any business within the jurisdiction of such
43 courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner
44 as may be specified by supreme court rule pursuant to
45 subdivision (6) of this subsection. Nothing in this
46 subdivision shall preclude those persons listed in
47 subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of section 571.030 while
48 within their jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed
49 in subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of
50 section 571.030, or such other persons who serve in a law
51 enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by
52 supreme court rule pursuant to subdivision (6) of this
53 subsection from carrying a concealed firearm within any of
54 the areas described in this subdivision. Possession of a
55 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any of the areas
56 listed in this subdivision shall not be a criminal offense

SB 1305 12
57 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
58 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
59 (5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of
60 local government; or any meeting of the general assembly or
61 a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in
62 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding
63 a valid concealed carry permit or endorsement from carrying
64 a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body which he or she
65 is a member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
66 premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
67 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
68 the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this subdivision
69 shall preclude a member of the general assembly, a full-time
70 employee of the general assembly employed under Section 17,
71 Article III, Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees
72 of the general assembly as determined under section 21.155,
73 or statewide elected officials and their employees, holding
74 a valid concealed carry permit or endorsement, from carrying
75 a concealed firearm in the state capitol building or at a
76 meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general
77 assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state
78 capitol building;
79 (6) The general assembly, supreme court, county or
80 municipality may by rule, administrative regulation, or
81 ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed
82 firearms by permit or endorsement holders in that portion of
83 a building owned, leased or controlled by that unit of
84 government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying
85 of concealed firearms is prohibited or limited shall be
86 clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the
87 restricted area. The statute, rule or ordinance shall
88 exempt any building used for public housing by private

SB 1305 13
89 persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private
90 dwellings owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of
91 government from any restriction on the carrying or
92 possession of a firearm. The statute, rule or ordinance
93 shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation but
94 may specify that persons violating the statute, rule or
95 ordinance may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to
96 leave the building and if employees of the unit of
97 government, be subjected to disciplinary measures for
98 violation of the provisions of the statute, rule or
99 ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
100 apply to any other unit of government;
101 (7) Any establishment licensed to dispense
102 intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises, which
103 portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the
104 consent of the owner or manager. The provisions of this
105 subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
106 establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
107 apply to any bona fide restaurant open to the general public
108 having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and
109 that receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual
110 income from the dining facilities by the sale of food. This
111 subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in
112 a vehicle on the premises of the establishment and shall not
113 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
114 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
115 premises. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes any
116 individual who has been issued a concealed carry permit or
117 endorsement to possess any firearm while intoxicated;
118 (8) Any area of an airport to which access is
119 controlled by the inspection of persons and property.
120 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the

SB 1305 14
121 airport shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
122 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
123 the vehicle is on the premises;
124 (9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is
125 prohibited by federal law;
126 (10) Any higher education institution or elementary or
127 secondary school facility without the consent of the
128 governing body of the higher education institution or a
129 school official or the district school board, unless the
130 person with the concealed carry endorsement or permit is a
131 teacher or administrator of an elementary or secondary
132 school who has been designated by his or her school district
133 as a school protection officer and is carrying a firearm in
134 a school within that district, in which case no consent is
135 required. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
136 premises of any higher education institution or elementary
137 or secondary school facility shall not be a criminal offense
138 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
139 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
140 (11) Any portion of a building used as a child care
141 facility without the consent of the manager. Nothing in
142 this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care
143 facility in a family home from owning or possessing a
144 firearm or a concealed carry permit or endorsement;
145 (12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by
146 the public without the consent of the owner or manager
147 pursuant to rules promulgated by the gaming commission.
148 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a
149 riverboat gambling operation shall not be a criminal offense
150 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
151 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;

SB 1305 15
152 (13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession
153 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the amusement
154 park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
155 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the
156 vehicle is on the premises;
157 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship
158 without the consent of the minister or person or persons
159 representing the religious organization that exercises
160 control over the place of religious worship. Possession of
161 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a
162 criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from
163 the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
164 premises;
165 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the
166 premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by means
167 of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
168 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the
169 writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch. The
170 owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private
171 business enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or
172 person may prohibit persons holding a concealed carry permit
173 or endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the
174 premises and may prohibit employees, not authorized by the
175 employer, holding a concealed carry permit or endorsement
176 from carrying concealed firearms on the property of the
177 employer. If the building or the premises are open to the
178 public, the employer of the business enterprise shall post
179 signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed
180 firearm is prohibited. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle
181 on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as
182 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
183 while the vehicle is on the premises. An employer may

SB 1305 16
184 prohibit employees or other persons holding a concealed
185 carry permit or endorsement from carrying a concealed
186 firearm in vehicles owned by the employer;
187 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating
188 capacity of five thousand or more. Possession of a firearm
189 in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense
190 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
191 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
192 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public.
193 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a
194 hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
195 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
196 the vehicle is on the premises.
197 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location
198 specified in subdivisions (1) to (17) of subsection 1 of
199 this section by any individual who holds a concealed carry
200 permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a
201 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
202 shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to
203 denial to the premises or removal from the premises. If
204 such person refuses to leave the premises and a peace
205 officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation
206 for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for the
207 first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation
208 occurs within a six-month period, such person shall be fined
209 an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars and his or her
210 permit, and, if applicable, endorsement to carry concealed
211 firearms shall be suspended for a period of one year. If a
212 third citation for a similar violation is issued within one
213 year of the first citation, such person shall be fined an
214 amount not to exceed five hundred dollars and shall have his
215 or her concealed carry permit, and, if applicable,

SB 1305 17
216 endorsement revoked and such person shall not be eligible
217 for a concealed carry permit for a period of three years.
218 Upon conviction of charges arising from a citation issued
219 pursuant to this subsection, the court shall notify the
220 sheriff of the county which issued the concealed carry
221 permit, or, if the person is a holder of a concealed carry
222 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, the court shall
223 notify the sheriff of the county which issued the
224 certificate of qualification for a concealed carry
225 endorsement and the department of revenue. The sheriff
226 shall suspend or revoke the concealed carry permit or, if
227 applicable, the certificate of qualification for a concealed
228 carry endorsement. If the person holds an endorsement, the
229 department of revenue shall issue a notice of such
230 suspension or revocation of the concealed carry endorsement
231 and take action to remove the concealed carry endorsement
232 from the individual's driving record. The director of
233 revenue shall notify the licensee that he or she must apply
234 for a new license pursuant to chapter 302 which does not
235 contain such endorsement. The notice issued by the
236 department of revenue shall be mailed to the last known
237 address shown on the individual's driving record. The
238 notice is deemed received three days after mailing.
1 571.215. 1. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
2 carry permit issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall
3 authorize the person in whose name the permit is issued to
4 carry concealed firearms on or about his or her person or
5 vehicle throughout the state. No Missouri lifetime or
6 extended concealed carry permit shall authorize any person
7 to carry concealed firearms into:
8 (1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or
9 station without the consent of the chief law enforcement

SB 1305 18
10 officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of
11 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the office or
12 station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
13 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
14 the vehicle is on the premises;
15 (2) Within [twenty-five] three hundred feet of any
16 polling place on any election day. Possession of a firearm
17 in a vehicle on the premises of the polling place shall not
18 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
19 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
20 premises;
21 (3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or
22 correctional institution, prison or jail. Possession of a
23 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile
24 detention, or correctional institution, prison or jail shall
25 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
26 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
27 on the premises;
28 (4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit,
29 appellate or supreme court, or any courtrooms,
30 administrative offices, libraries, or other rooms of any
31 such court whether or not such court solely occupies the
32 building in question. This subdivision shall also include,
33 but not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other
34 court offices, any room or office wherein any of the courts
35 or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily
36 conducting any business within the jurisdiction of such
37 courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner
38 as may be specified by supreme court rule under subdivision
39 (6) of this subsection. Nothing in this subdivision shall
40 preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of
41 subsection 2 of section 571.030 while within their

SB 1305 19
42 jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
43 subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section
44 571.030, or such other persons who serve in a law
45 enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by
46 supreme court rule under subdivision (6) of this subsection
47 from carrying a concealed firearm within any of the areas
48 described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a
49 vehicle on the premises of any of the areas listed in this
50 subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
51 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
52 the vehicle is on the premises;
53 (5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of
54 local government, or any meeting of the general assembly or
55 a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in
56 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding
57 a valid Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
58 from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body
59 which he or she is a member. Possession of a firearm in a
60 vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so
61 long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
62 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in
63 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the general
64 assembly, a full-time employee of the general assembly
65 employed under Section 17, Article III, Constitution of
66 Missouri, legislative employees of the general assembly as
67 determined under section 21.155, or statewide elected
68 officials and their employees, holding a valid Missouri
69 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit, from carrying a
70 concealed firearm in the state capitol building or at a
71 meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general
72 assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state
73 capitol building;

SB 1305 20
74 (6) The general assembly, supreme court, county, or
75 municipality may by rule, administrative regulation, or
76 ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed
77 firearms by permit holders in that portion of a building
78 owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government.
79 Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed
80 firearms is prohibited or limited shall be clearly
81 identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted
82 area. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall exempt any
83 building used for public housing by private persons,
84 highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings
85 owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from
86 any restriction on the carrying or possession of a firearm.
87 The statute, rule, or ordinance shall not specify any
88 criminal penalty for its violation but may specify that
89 persons violating the statute, rule, or ordinance may be
90 denied entrance to the building, ordered to leave the
91 building and if employees of the unit of government, be
92 subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the
93 provisions of the statute, rule, or ordinance. The
94 provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other
95 unit of government;
96 (7) Any establishment licensed to dispense
97 intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises, which
98 portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the
99 consent of the owner or manager. The provisions of this
100 subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
101 establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
102 apply to any bona fide restaurant open to the general public
103 having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and
104 that receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual
105 income from the dining facilities by the sale of food. This

SB 1305 21
106 subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in
107 a vehicle on the premises of the establishment and shall not
108 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
109 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
110 premises. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes any
111 individual who has been issued a Missouri lifetime or
112 extended concealed carry permit to possess any firearm while
113 intoxicated;
114 (8) Any area of an airport to which access is
115 controlled by the inspection of persons and property.
116 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the
117 airport shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
118 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
119 the vehicle is on the premises;
120 (9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is
121 prohibited by federal law;
122 (10) Any higher education institution or elementary or
123 secondary school facility without the consent of the
124 governing body of the higher education institution or a
125 school official or the district school board, unless the
126 person with the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
127 carry permit is a teacher or administrator of an elementary
128 or secondary school who has been designated by his or her
129 school district as a school protection officer and is
130 carrying a firearm in a school within that district, in
131 which case no consent is required. Possession of a firearm
132 in a vehicle on the premises of any higher education
133 institution or elementary or secondary school facility shall
134 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
135 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
136 on the premises;

SB 1305 22
137 (11) Any portion of a building used as a child care
138 facility without the consent of the manager. Nothing in
139 this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care
140 facility in a family home from owning or possessing a
141 firearm or a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
142 permit;
143 (12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by
144 the public without the consent of the owner or manager under
145 rules promulgated by the gaming commission. Possession of a
146 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling
147 operation shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
148 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
149 the vehicle is on the premises;
150 (13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession
151 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the amusement
152 park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
153 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the
154 vehicle is on the premises;
155 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship
156 without the consent of the minister or person or persons
157 representing the religious organization that exercises
158 control over the place of religious worship. Possession of
159 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a
160 criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from
161 the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
162 premises;
163 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the
164 premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by means
165 of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
166 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the
167 writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch. The
168 owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private

SB 1305 23
169 business enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or
170 person may prohibit persons holding a Missouri lifetime or
171 extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed
172 firearms on the premises and may prohibit employees, not
173 authorized by the employer, holding a Missouri lifetime or
174 extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed
175 firearms on the property of the employer. If the building
176 or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the
177 business enterprise shall post signs on or about the
178 premises if carrying a concealed firearm is prohibited.
179 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
180 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
181 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
182 on the premises. An employer may prohibit employees or
183 other persons holding a Missouri lifetime or extended
184 concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm in
185 vehicles owned by the employer;
186 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating
187 capacity of five thousand or more. Possession of a firearm
188 in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense
189 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
190 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
191 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public.
192 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a
193 hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
194 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
195 the vehicle is on the premises.
196 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location
197 specified in subdivisions (1) to (17) of subsection 1 of
198 this section by any individual who holds a Missouri lifetime
199 or extended concealed carry permit shall not be a criminal
200 act but may subject the person to denial to the premises or

SB 1305 24
201 removal from the premises. If such person refuses to leave
202 the premises and a peace officer is summoned, such person
203 may be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed one
204 hundred dollars for the first offense. If a second citation
205 for a similar violation occurs within a six-month period,
206 such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed two
207 hundred dollars and his or her permit to carry concealed
208 firearms shall be suspended for a period of one year. If a
209 third citation for a similar violation is issued within one
210 year of the first citation, such person shall be fined an
211 amount not to exceed five hundred dollars and shall have his
212 or her Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
213 revoked and such person shall not be eligible for a Missouri
214 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or a concealed
215 carry permit issued under sections 571.101 to 571.121 for a
216 period of three years. Upon conviction of charges arising
217 from a citation issued under this subsection, the court
218 shall notify the sheriff of the county which issued the
219 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit. The
220 sheriff shall suspend or revoke the Missouri lifetime or
221 extended concealed carry permit.
✓